Tennessee, session 114, SB2578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The residential burn building located on the campus of the Tennessee fire
services and codes enforcement academy is hereby designated as the "Charles 'Charlie'
J. Lewis Residential Burn Building", in honor of his valuable service and legacy within
the firefighting community in this state.
(b) From existing resources, the academy is directed to erect suitable signs or to
affix suitable markers designating such edifice as the "Charles 'Charlie' J. Lewis
Residential Burn Building".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2578
012059
- 1 -